New Jersey, session 221, S631.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a. The department shall reimburse a local unit for actual costs reasonably incurred by the local unit in responding to an emergency inside a State park or forest.  A local unit seeking reimbursement shall submit to the department a written invoice, along with any other documentation or verification of costs as the department may require, within 30 days after responding to an emergency.  The department shall make the reimbursement within 30 days after receipt of the invoice. b.    As used in this section, local unit means any county, municipality, or any agency, authority, or other entity thereof, or any fire district. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately, but shall only apply to costs incurred by local units after the date of enactment.